Nevada, session 83, AB112.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 608.01975 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
608.01975 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if
an employer provides paid or unpaid sick leave for the use of his or
her employees, the employer must allow an employee to use any
accrued sick leave to assist a member of the immediate family of the
employee who has an illness, injury, medical appointment or other
authorized medical need to the same extent and under the same
conditions that apply to the employee when taking such leave.
2. An employer may limit the amount of sick leave that an
employee may use pursuant to subsection 1 to an amount which is
equal to not less than the amount of sick leave that the employee
accrues during a 6-month period.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
3. The Labor Commissioner shall prepare a bulletin which
clearly sets forth an explanation of the provisions of this section.
The Labor Commissioner shall post the bulletin on the Internet
website maintained by the Office of Labor Commissioner and shall
require each employer that provides sick leave to employees to post
the bulletin in a conspicuous location in each workplace maintained
by the employer. The bulletin may be included in any printed
abstract posted by the employer pursuant to NRS 608.013.
4. The provisions of this section shall not be construed to:
(a) Limit or abridge any other rights, remedies or procedures
available under the law;
(b) Negate any other rights, remedies or procedures available to
an aggrieved party;
(c) Prohibit, preempt or discourage any contract or other
agreement that provides a more generous sick leave benefit or paid
time off benefit; or
(d) Extend the maximum amount of leave to which an employee
is entitled to take pursuant to the Family and Medical Leave Act of
1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq. ; or
(e) Diminish the obligation of an employer to comply with any
of the following that provide the same or a more generous sick
leave benefit:
(1) A collective bargaining agreement;
(2) A policy of the employer;
(3) An employment contract; or
(4) Any applicable local, state or federal law.
5. An employer shall not deny an employee the right to use
accrued sick leave in accordance with the provisions of this section
or retaliate against an employee for attempting to prosecute a
violation of this section or for exercising any rights afforded by this
section.
6. The provisions of this section do not apply [:
(a) To] to the extent prohibited by federal law . [; or
(b) With regard to an employee of the employer if the employee
is covered under a valid collective bargaining agreement.]
7. As used in this section, “immediate family” means:
(a) The child, foster child, spouse, domestic partner, sibling,
parent, mother-in-law, father-in-law, grandchild, grandparent or
stepparent of an employee; or
(b) Any person for whom the employee is the legal guardian.
Sec. 2. Insofar as they conflict with the provisions of such an
agreement, the amendatory provisions of this act do not apply
during the current term of any collective bargaining agreement
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
entered into before October 1, 2025, but do apply to any extension
or renewal of such an agreement and to any collective bargaining
agreement entered into on or after October 1, 2025. For the purposes
of this section, the term of an agreement ends on the date provided
in the agreement, notwithstanding any provision of the agreement
that remains in effect, in whole or in part, after that date until a
successor agreement becomes effective.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)